North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-15 Revised Uniform Adoption Act

14-15-01.
Definitions.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abandon” means:

As to a parent of a child not in the custody of that parent, failure by the noncustodial parent significantly without justifiable cause to:

Communicate through physical contact or oral conversation with the child; or

Provide for the care and support of the child as required by law.

As to a parent of a child in that parent’s custody:

To leave the child for an indefinite period without making firm and agreed plans, with the child’s immediate caregiver, for the parent’s resumption of physical custody;

Following the child’s birth or treatment at a hospital, to fail to arrange for the child’s discharge within ten days after the child no longer requires hospital care; or

To willfully fail to furnish food, shelter, clothing, or medical attention reasonably sufficient to meet the child’s needs.

“Adult” means an individual who is not a minor.

“Agency” means an entity licensed under chapter 50-12 to place minors for adoption.

“Child” means a son or daughter, whether by birth or adoption.

“Court” means the district court of this state, and when the context requires means the court of any other state empowered to grant petitions for adoption.

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Genetic parent” means the biological mother or adjudicated mother of the adopted child, or the presumed father or adjudicated father of the adopted child under chapter 14-20.

“Genetic sibling” means individuals with genetic relationship of sister, brother, half-sister, or half-brother.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department.

“Identifying” includes full name, address, date of birth, telephone number, or anything that may lead to the identity of any previously undisclosed individual.

“Investigation” includes information obtained regarding the child’s history, a preplacement adoption assessment of the prospective adoptive family, and an evaluation of the child’s placement in the adoptive home.

“Minor” means an individual under the age of eighteen years.

“Nonidentifying adoptive information” means:

Age of genetic parent in years at the birth of the adopted child.

Heritage of genetic parent.

Educational attainments, including the number of years of school completed by genetic parent at the time of birth of the adopted child.

General physical appearance of genetic parent at the time of birth of the adopted child, including the height, weight, color of hair, eyes, skin, and other information of a similar nature.

Talents, hobbies, and special interests of genetic parents.

Existence of any other children born to either genetic parent.

Reasons for child being placed for adoption or for termination of parental right.

Religion of genetic parent.

Vocation of genetic parent in general terms.

Health history of genetic parents and blood relatives in a manner prescribed by the department.

Such further information which, in the judgment of the agency, will not be detrimental to the adoptive parent or the adopted individual requesting the information, but the additional information may not identify genetic parents by name or location.

“Relative” means any individual having the following relationship to the minor by marriage, blood, or adoption: brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, first cousin, uncle, aunt, or grandparent.

“Stepparent” means an individual who is married to a parent of a child who has not adopted the child.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2003, ch. 126, § 1; 2017, ch. 120, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 10, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 118, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Interstate child placement compact, see N.D.C.C. ch. 14-13.

14-15-01.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abandon” means:

As to a parent of a child not in the custody of that parent, failure by the noncustodial parent significantly without justifiable cause to:

Communicate through physical contact or oral conversation with the child; or

Provide for the care and support of the child as required by law.

As to a parent of a child in that parent’s custody:

To leave the child for an indefinite period without making firm and agreed plans, with the child’s immediate caregiver, for the parent’s resumption of physical custody;

Following the child’s birth or treatment at a hospital, to fail to arrange for the child’s discharge within ten days after the child no longer requires hospital care; or

To willfully fail to furnish food, shelter, clothing, or medical attention reasonably sufficient to meet the child’s needs.

“Adult” means an individual who is not a minor.

“Agency” means an entity licensed under chapter 50-12 to place minors for adoption.

“Child” means a son or daughter, whether by birth or adoption.

“Court” means the district court of this state, and when the context requires means the court of any other state empowered to grant petitions for adoption.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Genetic parent” means the biological mother or adjudicated mother of the adopted child, or the presumed father or adjudicated father of the adopted child under chapter 14-20.

“Genetic sibling” means individuals with genetic relationship of sister, brother, half-sister, or half-brother.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department.

“Identifying” includes full name, address, date of birth, telephone number, or anything that may lead to the identity of any previously undisclosed individual.

“Investigation” includes information obtained regarding the child’s history, a preplacement adoption assessment of the prospective adoptive family, and an evaluation of the child’s placement in the adoptive home.

“Minor” means an individual under the age of eighteen years.

“Nonidentifying adoptive information” means:

Age of genetic parent in years at the birth of the adopted child.

Heritage of genetic parent.

Educational attainments, including the number of years of school completed by genetic parent at the time of birth of the adopted child.

General physical appearance of genetic parent at the time of birth of the adopted child, including the height, weight, color of hair, eyes, skin, and other information of a similar nature.

Talents, hobbies, and special interests of genetic parents.

Existence of any other children born to either genetic parent.

Reasons for child being placed for adoption or for termination of parental right.

Religion of genetic parent.

Vocation of genetic parent in general terms.

Health history of genetic parents and blood relatives in a manner prescribed by the department.

Such further information which, in the judgment of the agency, will not be detrimental to the adoptive parent or the adopted individual requesting the information, but the additional information may not identify genetic parents by name or location.

“Relative” means any individual having the following relationship to the minor by marriage, blood, or adoption: brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, first cousin, uncle, aunt, or grandparent.

“Stepparent” means an individual who is married to a parent of a child who has not adopted the child.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2003, ch. 126, § 1; 2017, ch. 120, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 10, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 118, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 48, effective September 1, 2022.

14-15-02.
Who may be adopted.

Any individual may be adopted.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1.

Collateral References.

Adoption of adult, 21 A.L.R.3d 1012.

Marital or sexual relationship between parties as affecting right to adopt, 42 A.L.R.4th 776.

“Wrongful adoption” causes of action against adoption agencies where children have or develop mental or physical problems that are misrepresented or not disclosed to adoptive parents, 74 A.L.R.5th 1.

14-15-03.
Who may adopt.

The following individuals may adopt:

A husband and wife together although one or both are minors.

An unmarried adult.

The unmarried father or mother of the individual to be adopted.

A married individual without the other spouse joining as a petitioner, if the individual to be adopted is not the adopting person’s spouse, and if:

The petitioner is a stepparent of the individual to be adopted and the biological or legal parent of the individual to be adopted consents;

The petitioner and the other spouse are legally separated; or

The failure of the other spouse to join in the petition or to consent to the adoption is excused by the court by reason of prolonged unexplained absence, unavailability, incapacity, or circumstances constituting an unreasonable withholding of consent.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 2.

14-15-04.
Venue — Inconvenient forum — Caption.

Proceedings for adoption must be brought in the court for the place in which, at the time of filing or granting the petition, the petitioner, or the individual to be adopted resides or is in military service or in which the agency having the care, custody, or control of the minor is located.

If the court finds in the interest of substantial justice that the matter should be heard in another forum, the court may transfer, stay, or dismiss the proceeding in whole or in part on any conditions that are just.

The caption of a petition for adoption must be styled substantially “In the Matter of the Adoption of _________ ”. The individual to be adopted must be designated in the caption under the name by which that individual is to be known if the petition is granted. If the child is placed for adoption by an agency, any name by which the child was previously known may not be disclosed in the petition, the notice of hearing, or in the decree of adoption.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 3.

14-15-05.
Persons required to consent to adoption.

Unless consent is not required under section 14-15-06, a petition to adopt a minor may be granted only if written consent to a particular adoption has been executed by:

The mother of the minor whether by birth or adoption;

The father of the minor, if:

The minor is the father’s child by adoption, or the father has otherwise legitimated the minor according to the laws of the place in which the adoption proceeding is brought; or

The person is presumed to be the biological father of the minor under subsection 1 of section 14-20-10, provided the nonexistence of the father and child relationship between them has not been judicially determined;

Any individual lawfully entitled to custody of the minor or empowered to consent;

The court having jurisdiction to determine custody of the minor, if the legal guardian or custodian of the minor is not empowered to consent to the adoption;

The minor, if more than ten years of age, unless the court in the best interest of the minor dispenses with the minor’s consent; and

The spouse of the minor to be adopted.

A petition to adopt an adult may be granted only if written consent to adoption has been executed by the adult and the adult’s spouse.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 1981, ch. 174, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 4; 2005, ch. 135, § 3.

14-15-06.
Individuals as to whom consent not required — Notice of hearing.

Consent to adoption is not required of:

A parent who has deserted a child without affording means of identification or who has abandoned a child.

A parent of a child in the custody of another, if the parent for a period of at least one year has failed significantly without justifiable cause:

To communicate with the child; or

To provide for the care and support of the child as required by law or judicial decree.

The father of a minor if the father’s consent is not required by subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 14-15-05.

A parent who has relinquished that parent’s right to consent under section 14-15-19.

A parent whose parental rights have been terminated by order of court under section 14-15-19.

A parent judicially declared incompetent or mentally defective if the court dispenses with the parent’s consent.

Any parent of the individual to be adopted, if the individual is an adult.

Any legal guardian or lawful custodian of the individual to be adopted, other than a parent, who has failed to respond in writing to a request for consent for a period of sixty days or who, after examination of the guardian’s or custodian’s written reasons for withholding consent, is found by the court to be withholding consent unreasonably.

The spouse of the individual to be adopted, if the failure of the spouse to consent to the adoption is excused by the court by reason of prolonged unexplained absence, unavailability, incapacity, or circumstances constituting an unreasonable withholding of consent.

A parent of the minor, if the failure of the parent to consent is excused by the court in the best interest of the child by reason of the parent’s prolonged unexplained absence, unavailability, incapacity, or significant failure, without justifiable cause, to establish a substantial relationship with the minor or to manifest a significant parental interest in the minor, or by reason of inability of the court to identify the parent.

Except as provided in section 14-15-11, notice of hearing on a petition for adoption need not be given to an individual whose consent is not required or to an individual whose consent or relinquishment has been filed with the petition.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 1981, ch. 174, § 2; 2003, ch. 126, § 5.

Cross-References.

Presumption of intent to abandon, see N.D.C.C. § 14-07-17.

14-15-07.
How consent is executed.

The required consent to adoption must be executed at any time after the birth of the child and in the manner following:

If by the individual to be adopted, in the presence of the court.

If by an agency, by the executive head or other authorized representative, in the presence of an individual authorized to take acknowledgments.

If by any other individual, in the presence of the court or in the presence of an individual authorized to take acknowledgments.

If by a court, by appropriate order or certificate.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 6.

14-15-08.
Withdrawal of consent.

A consent to adoption cannot be withdrawn after the entry of a decree of adoption.

A consent to adoption may be withdrawn before the entry of a decree of adoption if the court finds, after notice and opportunity to be heard is afforded to petitioner, the individual seeking the withdrawal, and the agency placing a child for adoption, that the withdrawal is in the best interest of the individual to be adopted and the court orders the withdrawal.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 7.

Collateral References.

Right of natural parent to withdraw valid consent to adoption of child, 74 A.L.R.3d 421.

Mistake or lack of understanding as ground for revocation of consent to adoption or of agreement releasing infant to adoption placement agency, 74 A.L.R.3d 489.

14-15-09.
Petition for adoption.

A petition for adoption must be signed and verified by the petitioner, filed with the clerk of the court, and state:

The date and place of birth of the individual to be adopted, if known.

The name to be used for the individual to be adopted.

The date petitioner acquired custody or date of placement of the minor and the name of the individual placing the minor.

The full name, age, place, and duration of residence of the petitioner.

The marital status of the petitioner, including the date and place of marriage, if married.

That the petitioner has facilities and resources, including those available under a subsidy agreement, suitable to provide for the nurture and care of the minor to be adopted, and that it is the desire of the petitioner to establish the relationship of parent and child with the individual to be adopted.

A description and estimate of value of any property of the individual to be adopted.

The name of any individual whose consent to the adoption is required, but who has not consented, and facts or circumstances which excuse the lack of the individual’s consent normally required to the adoption.

The department as respondent.

The human service zone as respondent if the minor to be adopted is in the custody of the human service zone.

That the petitioner’s expenses were reasonable as verified by the court. Reasonable fees may be charged for professional services and living expenses if reflected in a report of agreements and disbursements filed under this chapter and approved by the court. The fees may not be contingent upon placement of the child for adoption, consent to adoption, or cooperation in the completion of adoption. Reasonable fees may include:

Preplacement counseling, adoption assessment, placement of the child, foster care, or other preadoption services, which must be paid directly to the provider of the services;

Legal fees relating to the petition for relinquishment or adoption, that must be paid directly to the provider of the services;

Medical expenses relating to prenatal care and the birth of the child, that are not already covered by health insurance;

Expenses for transportation, meals, and lodging incurred for placement of the child or in order to receive counseling, legal, or medical services related to the pregnancy, birth, or placement; and

Living expenses of the birth mother which are needed to maintain an adequate standard of living, which the birth mother is unable to otherwise maintain because of loss of income or other support resulting from the pregnancy.

The payments may cover expenses incurred during the pregnancy-related incapacity but not for a period longer than six weeks following the delivery, unless the court determines within the six-week period that the birth mother is unable to be employed due to physical limitations relating to the birth of the child.

Living expenses do not include expenses for lost wages, gifts, educational expenses, vacations, or other similar expenses of a birth mother.

A certified copy of the birth certificate or verification of birth record of the individual to be adopted, if available, and the required consents and relinquishments must be filed with the clerk.

Any individual filing a petition shall pay to the clerk of court a filing fee as prescribed in subsection 1 of section 27-05.2-03.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 1979, ch. 200, § 1; 1985, ch. 336, § 3; 1999, ch. 278, § 35; 2003, ch. 126, § 8; 2019, ch. 391, § 11, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 353, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

14-15-10.
Report of petitioner’s expenditures.

Except as specified in subsection 2, the petitioner in any proceeding for the adoption of a minor shall file, before the petition is heard, a full accounting report in a manner acceptable to the court of all disbursements of anything of value made or agreed to be made by or on behalf of the petitioner in connection with the adoption. Fees may not be contingent upon placement of the child for adoption, consent to adoption, or cooperation in the completion of adoption. The report must show any expenses incurred in connection with:

Preplacement counseling, adoption assessment, placement of the child, foster care, or other preadoption services, that must be paid directly to the provider of the services;

Legal fees relating to the petition for relinquishment or adoption, that must be paid directly to the provider of the services;

Medical expenses relating to prenatal care and the birth of the child, that are not already covered by health insurance;

Expenses for transportation, meals, and lodging incurred for placement of the child or in order to receive counseling, legal, or medical services related to the pregnancy, birth, or placement; and

Living expenses of the birth mother which are needed to maintain an adequate standard of living, which the birth mother is unable to otherwise maintain because of loss of income or other support resulting from the pregnancy.

Payments may cover expenses incurred during the pregnancy-related incapacity but not for a period longer than six weeks following the delivery, unless the court determines within the six-week period that the birth mother is unable to be employed due to physical limitations relating to the birth of the child.

Living expenses do not include expenses for lost wages, gifts, educational expenses, vacations, or other similar expenses of a birth mother.

This section does not apply to an adoption by a stepparent whose spouse is a biological or adoptive parent of the child.

Any report made under this section must be signed and verified by the petitioner.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 9.

Collateral References.

Validity of agreement to pay expenses attendant on birth of child on condition that natural parents consent to adoption of child, 43 A.L.R.4th 935.

14-15-11.
Notice of petition — Investigation and hearing.

After the filing of a petition to adopt a minor, the court shall fix a time and place for hearing the petition. At least twenty days before the date of hearing, notice of the filing of the petition and of the time and place of hearing must be given by the petitioner to the department and if the minor to be adopted is in the custody of the human service zone to the human service zone; any agency or individual whose consent to the adoption is required by this chapter but who has not consented; an individual whose consent is dispensed with upon any ground mentioned in subdivisions a, b, f, h, i, and j of subsection 1 of section 14-15-06 but who has not consented; any appropriate Indian tribe; and any individual identified by the court as a biological parent or a possible biological parent of the minor, upon making inquiry to the extent necessary and appropriate, as in proceedings under section 27-20.3-22, unless the individual has relinquished parental rights or the individual’s parental rights have been previously terminated by a court. The notice to the department and if the minor to be adopted is in the custody of the human service zone to the human service zone must be accompanied by a copy of the petition.

Notice of the filing of a petition to adopt an adult must be given by the petitioner at least twenty days before the date of the hearing to each living parent of the adult to be adopted.

An investigation must be made by a licensed child-placing agency to inquire into the conditions and antecedents of a minor sought to be adopted and of the petitioner for the purpose of ascertaining whether the adoptive home is a suitable home for the minor and whether the proposed adoption is in the best interest of the minor.

A written report of the investigation must be filed with the court by the investigator before the petition is heard.

The report of the investigation must contain a review of the child’s history; a preplacement adoption assessment of the petitioner, including a criminal history record investigation of the petitioner; and a postplacement evaluation of the placement with a recommendation as to the granting of the petition for adoption and any other information the court requires regarding the petitioner or the minor.

An investigation and report is not required in cases in which a stepparent is the petitioner or the individual to be adopted is an adult. The department and human service zone, when required to consent to the adoption, may give consent without making the investigation. If the petitioner is a relative other than a stepparent of the minor, the minor has lived with the petitioner for at least nine months, no allegations of abuse or neglect have been filed against the petitioner or any member of the petitioner’s household, and the court is satisfied that the proposed adoptive home is appropriate for the minor, the court may waive the investigation and report required under this section.

The department and human service zone, when required to consent to the adoption, may request the licensed child-placing agency to conduct further investigation and to make a written report thereof as a supplemental report to the court.

After the filing of a petition to adopt an adult, the court by order shall direct that a copy of the petition and a notice of the time and place of the hearing be given to any individual whose consent to the adoption is required but who has not consented and to each living parent of the adult to be adopted. The court may order an appropriate investigation to assist it in determining whether the adoption is in the best interest of the individuals involved.

Notice must be given in the manner appropriate under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of process in a civil action in this state or in any manner the court by order directs. Proof of the giving of the notice must be filed with the court before the petition is heard.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 1975, ch. 128, § 1; 1977, ch. 136, § 1; 1979, ch. 200, § 2; 1981, ch. 174, § 3; 1993, ch. 153, § 1; 1993, ch. 154, § 1; 1999, ch. 148, § 1; 1999, ch. 282, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 10; 2005, ch. 135, § 4; 2019, ch. 391, § 12, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 245, § 7, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 353, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 14-15-11 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 7 of Chapter 353, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2086; and Section 7 of Chapter 245, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1035.

14-15-12.
Required residence of minor.

A final decree of adoption may not be issued and an interlocutory decree of adoption does not become final, until the minor to be adopted, other than a stepchild of the petitioner, has lived in the adoptive home:

For at least six months after placement by an agency;

For six months after placement by a parent in accordance with an identified relinquishment under chapter 14-15.1;

As a foster child for at least six months and has been placed for adoption by an agency; or

For at least six months after the department and human service zone or the court has been informed of the custody of the minor by the petitioner, and the department and human service zone or the court has had an opportunity to observe or investigate the adoptive home.

If a child who has been placed for adoption dies before the six-month residency requirement of subsection 1 is met, the court may grant the final decree of adoption upon a finding that a proper and legitimate reason exists for granting the final decree.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 11; 2013, ch. 127, § 1; 2019, ch. 391, § 13, effective January 1, 2020.

14-15-12.1.
Health insurance requirements for adoptees.

The department or child-placing agency involved in an adoption action may at any time before a final decree of adoption, if legal custody of the individual to be adopted is not held by the department, a county social service board, human service zone, a child-placing agency, or an equivalent office or agency outside the state, require the petitioner for the adoption of another individual to show proof that a health insurance policy is in effect which provides coverage for the individual to be adopted. If proof of health insurance coverage is submitted by the petitioner, no further bond of any kind may be required by the department or a human service zone in regard to health coverage of the individual to be adopted.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 198, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 12; 2019, ch. 391, § 14, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 391, § 15, effective January 1, 2020.

14-15-13.
Appearance — Continuance — Disposition of petition.

The petitioner and the individual to be adopted shall appear at the hearing on the petition, unless the presence of either is excused by the court for good cause shown.

The court may continue the hearing from time to time to permit further observation, investigation, or consideration of any facts or circumstances affecting the granting of the petition.

If at the conclusion of the hearing, the court determines that the required consents have been obtained and that the adoption is in the best interest of the individual to be adopted, the court may:

Issue a final decree of adoption; or

Issue an interlocutory decree of adoption which by its own terms automatically becomes a final decree of adoption on a day specified in the decree, that day may not be less than six months nor more than one year after the minor was placed in the adoptive home by an agency or after the department and human service zone or the court was informed of the custody of the minor by the petitioner, unless sooner vacated by the court for good cause shown. In an interlocutory decree of adoption, the court shall provide for observation, investigation, and further report on the adoptive home during the interlocutory period.

The court shall make a finding as to the reasonableness of expenses reported under section 14-15-10.

If the requirements for a decree under subsection 3 have not been met, the court shall dismiss the petition and determine the individual to have custody of the minor, including the petitioners if in the best interest of the minor.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 1979, ch. 200, § 3; 1979, ch. 201, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 13; 2019, ch. 391, § 16, effective January 1, 2020.

14-15-14.
Effect of petition and decree of adoption.

A final decree of adoption and an interlocutory decree of adoption which has become final, whether issued by a court of this state or of any other place, have the following effect as to matters within the jurisdiction or before a court of this state:

Except with respect to a spouse of the petitioner and relatives of the spouse, to relieve the biological parents of the adopted individual of all parental rights and responsibilities, and to terminate all legal relationships between the adopted individual and the individual’s relatives, including the individual’s biological parents, so that the adopted individual thereafter is a stranger to the individual’s former relatives for all purposes, including inheritance and the interpretation or construction of documents, statutes, and instruments, whether executed before or after the adoption is decreed, that do not expressly include the individual by name or by some designation not based on a parent and child or blood relationship; and

To create the relationship of parent and child between petitioner and the adopted individual, as if the adopted individual were a legitimate blood descendant of the petitioner, for all purposes, including inheritance and applicability of statutes, documents, and instruments, whether executed before or after the adoption is decreed, which do not expressly exclude an adopted individual from their operation or effect.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, if a parent of a child dies without the relationship of parent and child having been previously terminated and a spouse of the living parent thereafter adopts the child, the child’s right of inheritance from or through the deceased parent is unaffected by the adoption.

An interlocutory decree of adoption, while it is in force, has the same legal effect as a final decree of adoption. If an interlocutory decree of adoption is vacated, it must be as though void from its issuance, and the rights, liabilities, and status of all affected individuals which have not become vested must be governed accordingly.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 14.

14-15-15.
Appeal and validation of adoption decree.

An appeal from any final order or decree rendered under this chapter may be taken in the manner and time provided for appeal from a judgment in a civil action.

Subject to the disposition of an appeal, upon the expiration of one year after an adoption decree is issued the decree cannot be questioned by any individual, including the petitioner, in any manner upon any ground, including fraud, misrepresentation, failure to give any required notice, or lack of jurisdiction of the parties or of the subject matter, unless, in the case of the adoption of a minor the petitioner has not taken custody of the minor.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 157, § 1; 2003, ch. 126, § 15.